Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1. Section 2 of  this 2025 Act is added to and made a part of ORS 690.005 to
690.225.
SECTION 2. (1) The Board of Cosmetology shall adopt rules to  allow an individual who
holds a provisional certificate issued under this section  to perform in a field of practice un-
der the supervision of  a practitioner who holds a certificate in the same field of practice and
meets the requirements established under paragraph (c) of this subsection. The rules adopted
under this subsection must establish:
(a) A process for the Health Licensing Office to  issue a provisional certificate, including
eligibility requirements specifying that the holder of  a provisional certificate shall be actively
working toward holding a certificate;
(b) A process to enable a practitioner  to supervise the holder of a provisional certificate;
and
(c) Requirements for a  practitioner to supervise the holder of a provisional certificate
that must include, but are not limited to, requirements that a practitioner:
(A) Shall have held, for at least five years, an active certificate in  a field of practice in
which the practitioner intends to offer supervision; and
(B) May not be subject to any current or pending disciplinary action.
(2)(a) An applicant for a  provisional certificate shall pay a fee established under ORS
676.576.
(b) The office may issue a provisional certificate to  perform in a field of practice only if
no school that offers a program  of study in the field of practice is located within 50 miles
of the applicant’s residential address.
(3) A provisional certificate issued under this  section may be renewed pursuant to rules
adopted by  the board. The holder of a provisional certificate may perform only in the field
of practice for which  the provisional certificate is issued and may hold provisional certif-
icates in more than one field of practice.
(4) The number of hours of supervised experience  completed by the holder of a provi-
sional certificate shall be credited in an equal number  toward the total number of educa-
tional hours required for issuance of a certificate under ORS 690.046.
Enrolled House Bill 2380 (HB 2380-A) Page 1
(5) A practitioner described in subsection (1) of this section may not be required to pay
a fee in order to supervise the holder of a provisional certificate.
(6) The board may adopt other rules as necessary to  carry out this section, including
rules to establish the amount of  time for which a provisional certificate issued under this
section is valid.
SECTION 3.  ORS 690.005 is amended to read:
690.005. As used in ORS 690.005 to 690.225:
(1) “Authorization” has the meaning given that term in ORS 676.562.
(2) “Barbering” means any  of the following practices, when done upon the human body for cos-
metic purposes and not for medical diagnosis or treatment of disease  or physical or mental ailments:
(a) Shampooing, styling, cutting, singeing and conditioning of the hair of an individual.
(b) Applying hair tonics, dressings and rinses.
(c) Massaging of the scalp,  face and neck and applying facial and scalp treatments with creams,
lotions, oils and other  cosmetic preparations, either by hand or mechanical appliances, except that
the mechanical appliances may not be galvanic or faradic.
(d) Shaving, trimming or cutting of the beard or mustache.
(3) “Certificate” means a written authorization for the holder to perform in one or more  fields
of practice.
(4) “Cosmetology” means the art or science  of beautifying and improving the skin, nails and hair
and the study of cosmetics and their application.
(5) “Demonstration permit” means a written  authorization for a person to practice, demonstrate
and teach one or more fields of practice on a temporary basis.
(6) “Esthetics” means any of the following skin care or facial care practices  performed on the
human body or face for the purpose of keeping the  skin of the human body or face healthy and at-
tractive and not for medical diagnosis or treatment of disease or physical or mental ailments:
(a) The use of the  hands or mechanical or electric apparatuses, appliances or devices for
cleansing, stimulating, manipulating, exfoliating or applying lotions or creams.
(b) Temporary removal of hair by using lotion, cream, an appliance, wax, thread, sugar,
tweezers, dermaplaning, a depilatory or other means.
(c) Makeup artistry.
(d) Eyebrow and eyelash services.
(e) Facial and body treatments.
(7) “Facility” means an establishment operated on a regular or irregular basis for  the purpose
of providing services in one or more fields of practice.
(8) “Field of practice” means the following cosmetology disciplines:
(a) Barbering.
(b) Esthetics.
(c) Hair design.
(d) Nail technology.
(e) Natural hair care.
(9) “Freelance license” means a written authorization that allows a  practitioner to practice
outside or away from a licensed facility.
(10) “Hair  design” means any of the following practices, when done upon the human body for
cosmetic purposes and not for medical diagnosis  or treatment of disease or physical or mental
ailments:
(a) Shaving, trimming or cutting of the beard or mustache.
(b) Styling, permanent waving, relaxing, cutting, singeing, bleaching, coloring, shampooing,  con-
ditioning, applying hair products or similar work upon the hair of an individual.
(c) Massaging the scalp and neck when performed in conjunction with activities in paragraph
(a) or (b) of this subsection.
(11) “Independent contractor” means a  practitioner who qualifies as an independent contractor
under ORS 670.600 and who is not under the control and direction of a facility license holder.
Enrolled House Bill 2380 (HB 2380-A) Page 2
(12) “License”  means a written authorization issued under ORS 690.055 to a person to operate
a facility or freelance business for providing services related to one or  more fields of practice to the
public.
(13)(a) “Mechanical or electrical apparatus, appliance or device” includes, but is not limited  to,
galvanic current, high-frequency microcurrents, light-emitting diode therapy and  microdermabrasion
that does not penetrate beyond the epidermis except through natural physiological effects.
(b) “Mechanical or electrical apparatus, appliance or device” does not include  lasers or intense
pulsed light or a device, as that term is defined by the Board of Cosmetology by rule,  in collab-
oration with the Board of Certified Advanced Estheticians.
(14) “Nail technology” means any of the following manicuring or pedicuring  practices performed
for cosmetic purposes and not for medical diagnosis or  treatment of disease or physical or mental
ailments:
(a) Cutting, trimming, polishing, coloring, tinting, cleansing or otherwise treating the nails of the
hands or feet.
(b) Massaging, cleansing, treating or beautifying the hands, arms below the elbow, feet or  legs
below the knee.
(c) Applying, sculpturing or removing artificial nails of the hands or feet.
(15)(a) “Natural hair care” means:
(A) The braiding, cornrowing, extending, lacing, locking, sewing, twisting, weaving or  wrapping
of human hair, natural fibers,  synthetic fibers or hair extensions through the use of hands or simple
devices such as clips, combs, hairpins or needle and thread;
(B) The use of scissors  to trim synthetic fibers, hair extensions or sewn-in weave extensions as
is necessary to perform the activities described in this paragraph;
(C) The making of customized wigs from natural hair, natural fibers,  synthetic fibers or hair
extensions; or
(D) Shampooing or conditioning of the hair of an individual.
(b) “Natural hair care” does not include  the use of scissors, except as provided in paragraph
(a)(B) of this subsection, penetrating chemical hair treatments, chemical hair  coloring agents,
chemical hair straightening agents, chemical hair joining agents,  permanent wave styles or chemical
hair bleaching agents.
(16) “Practitioner”  means a person certified to perform services included within a field of prac-
tice.
(17) “Provisional certificate” means a written authorization  issued under section 2 of this
2025 Act for the holder to perform in one field of practice under the supervision of a practi-
tioner who holds a certificate in the same field of practice.
[(17)] (18) “Registration” means a written  authorization issued to an independent contractor to
hold forth to the public as a business entity providing services in a field of practice.
[(18)] (19) “School” means an educational establishment that offers a program of study in  one
or more fields of practice other than natural hair care, including, but not limited to,  a career school
licensed under ORS 345.010 to 345.340 including a  proficiency-based career school, a community
college or an educational establishment operated by a school district.
[(19)] (20) “Temporary  facility permit” means a written authorization issued under ORS 690.055
to provide services on a temporary basis in one or more fields of practice.
SECTION 4.
 ORS 690.035 is amended to read:
690.035. [A person desiring ] In order to obtain a certificate , provisional certificate  or demon-
stration permit , a person  shall apply in writing to the Health Licensing Office on a form approved
by the office. [ Each] The application [ shall] must contain :
(1) An affirmation by the applicant that the information contained therein is  accurate[ . The
application must also include ]; and
(2) Evidence establishing to the satisfaction  of the office that the applicant possesses the nec-
essary qualifications.
SECTION 5.  ORS 690.046 is amended to read:
Enrolled House Bill 2380 (HB 2380-A) Page 3
690.046. (1) To qualify for certification as a practitioner of hair design, barbering, esthetics, nail
technology or natural hair care, an applicant shall:
(a) If the applicant is applying  for certification to practice hair design, barbering, esthetics or
nail technology:
(A) Complete the curriculum requirements in the field of practice for which certification is
sought that are adopted by the Board of Cosmetology by rule and approved by the Health Licensing
Office;  and
(B) Submit satisfactory  evidence from a school  or, if the applicant holds a provisional cer-
tificate issued under section 2  of this 2025 Act, from the applicant’s supervisor,  to the office
that demonstrates the applicant has successfully met the requirements described in  subparagraph
(A) of this paragraph.
(b) Successfully pass the certification  examination approved, administered or recognized by the
board in the field of practice for which certification is sought.
(c) Pay the applicable fees established under ORS 676.576.
(d) Meet any additional requirements the board may impose by rule in the  field of practice for
which certification is sought.
(2) The office may waive all or part of the requirements described  in subsection (1) of this sec-
tion and  allow an applicant who meets all of the other requirements of subsection (1) of this section
to take the certification examination if:
(a) For  an applicant who holds an active authorization issued in another state or territory of
the United States or another country:
(A) The office determines that the applicant’s education or training, including any education  or
training obtained in the military, is substantially equivalent  to the certification requirements de-
scribed in subsection (1) of this section and any rules adopted under subsection (1) of this  section;
and
(B) The applicant’s active authorization  has not been subject to disciplinary action by the au-
thorizing body.
(b)(A) For an applicant  who has received education or training outside of this state and does
not hold an active authorization issued  by another jurisdiction, the school that provided to the ap-
plicant a skills assessment and practical evaluation:
(i) Submits to  the office evidence that the applicant passed the skills assessment and practical
evaluation;  and
(ii) Attests, on a form prescribed  by the office, to having verified the applicant’s prior training
or education.
(B) An applicant described in this paragraph shall obtain a skills evaluation and practical  as-
sessment from a school.
(3) A person  who is certified to practice hair design or barbering under this section is author-
ized to practice natural hair care.
SECTION 6.
(1) Section 2  of this 2025 Act and the amendments to ORS 690.005, 690.035
and 690.046 by sections 3 to 5 of this 2025 Act become operative on January 1, 2027.
(2) The Board of  Cosmetology and the Health Licensing Office may take any action before
the operative date specified in subsection (1) of this section that is necessary to  enable the
board and the office to exercise, on and after the operative date specified  in subsection (1)
of this section, all of the duties, functions and powers conferred on the board and the  office
by section 2 of this 2025  Act and the amendments to ORS 690.005, 690.035 and 690.046 by
sections 3 to 5 of this 2025 Act.
SECTION 7. This 2025 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency  is declared to exist, and this 2025 Act takes effect
on its passage.
Enrolled House Bill 2380 (HB 2380-A) Page 4
Passed by House April 22, 2025
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Julie Fahey, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate May 14, 2025
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tobias Read, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 2380 (HB 2380-A) Page 5